Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 135A.052, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Statement of missions. (a) The legislature recognizes each type of public postsecondary institution to have a distinctive mission within the overall provision of public higher education in the state and a responsibility to cooperate with each other. These missions are as follows: (1) the technical colleges shall offer vocational training and education to prepare students for skilled occupations that do not require a baccalaureate degree; (2) the community colleges shall offer lower division instruction in academic programs, occupational programs in which all credits earned will be accepted for transfer to a baccalaureate degree in the same field of study, and remedial studies, for students transferring to baccalaureate institutions and for those seeking associate degrees; (3) consolidated community technical colleges shall offer the same types of instruction, programs, certificates, diplomas, and degrees as the technical colleges and community colleges offer; (4) the state universities shall offer undergraduate and graduate instruction through the master's degree, including specialist certificates, in the liberal arts and sciences and professional education, and may offer applied doctoral degrees in education, business, psychology, physical therapy, audiology, new text begin cybersecurity, new text end and nursing; and (5) the University of Minnesota shall offer undergraduate, graduate, and professional instruction through the doctoral degree, and shall be the primary state supported academic agency for research and extension services. (b) It is part of the mission of each system that within the system's resources the system's governing board and chancellor or president shall endeavor to: (1) prevent the waste or unnecessary spending of public money; (2) use innovative fiscal and human resource practices to manage the state's resources and operate the system as efficiently as possible; (3) coordinate the system's activities wherever appropriate with the activities of the other system and governmental agencies; (4) use technology where appropriate to increase system productivity, improve customer service, increase public access to information about the system, and increase public participation in the business of the system; (5) utilize constructive and cooperative labor-management practices to the extent otherwise required by chapters 43A and 179A; and (6) recommend to the legislature appropriate changes in law necessary to carry out the mission of the system.